North Carolina statutes. Chapter 95. Department of Labor and Labor Regulations.
Article 5A. Regulation of Private Personnel Services.

§ 95-47.1.
Definitions.

As used in this Article, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Accept” employment means to accept an employer’s offer of employment or to begin work for an employer.

“Applicant,” except where it refers to an applicant for a private personnel services license, means any person who uses or attempts to use the services of a private personnel service in seeking employment.

“Commissioner” means the North Carolina Commissioner of Labor or any person designated by the Commissioner as the representative of the Commissioner.

“Complaint” means a communication to the Commissioner or department alleging facts that could support issuance of a warning or citation under

G.S. 95-47.9

.

“Contract” means any agreement between a private personnel service and an applicant obligating the applicant to pay a fee or any agreement subsequent to such contract reducing the obligations of the private personnel service to the applicant under the contract.

“Employee” means a person performing work or services of any kind or character for compensation.

“Employer” means a person employing or seeking to employ a person for compensation, or any representative or employee of such employer.

“Employment” means any service or engagement rendered or undertaken for wages, salary, commission, or other form of compensation.

“Fee” means anything of value, including money or other valuable consideration or services or the promise of any of the foregoing, required or received by a private personnel service, in payment for any of its services, or act rendered or to be rendered by any private personnel service.

“Interview” means a meeting between an employer and an applicant to discuss potential employment.

“Job order” means an oral or written communication from an employer authorizing a private personnel service to refer applicants for a position the employer has available.

“Licensee” means any person licensed by the Commissioner to operate a private personnel service.

“Manager” of a private personnel service means the person who is responsible for the operation of an office of a private personnel service.

“Owner” of a private personnel service means the sole proprietor of a private personnel service operated as a sole proprietorship; any partner in a partnership that owns or operates a private personnel service; any stockholder with a financial interest greater than 10 percent (10%) in a corporation that owns or operates a private personnel service.

“Person” means any individual, association, partnership or corporation.

“Private personnel service” means any business operated in the State of North Carolina by any person for profit which secures employment or by any form of advertising holds itself out to applicants as able to secure employment or to provide information or service of any kind purporting to promote, lead to or result in employment for the applicant with any employer other than itself, where any applicant may become liable for the payment of a fee to the private personnel service, either directly or indirectly. “Private personnel service” does not include:

Any educational, religious, charitable, fraternal or benevolent organization which charges no fee for services rendered in securing employment or providing information about employment;

Any employment service operated by the State of North Carolina, the Government of the United States, or any city, county, or town, or any agency thereof;

Any temporary help service that at no time advertises or represents that its employee may, with the approval of the temporary help service, be employed by one of its client companies on a permanent basis and which does not act as a private personnel service or an employer fee paid personnel service;

Any newspaper of general circulation or other business engaged primarily in communicating information other than information about specific positions of employment and that does not purport to adapt the information provided to the needs or desires of an individual subscriber;

Employment offices that charge no fee to the applicant other than union dues or to the employer and which are used solely for the hiring of employees under a valid union contract by the employer subscribing to this contract;

Any employer fee paid personnel consulting service or temporary help service that offers temporary to permanent placement when the service operates on a one hundred percent (100%) employer fee paid service basis, requires no applicant placement contract, and has no recourse against an applicant for a fee under any circumstances.

“Refer” an applicant means to submit resumes to an employer, arrange interviews between an applicant and an employer, or to provide an employer with the name of an applicant.

History.

1929, c. 178, ss. 1, 10; 1979, c. 780, s. 1; 1989, c. 414, s. 1.

§ 95-47.2.
Licensing procedures.

No person shall open, keep, maintain, own, operate or carry on a private personnel service unless the person has first procured a license therefor as provided in this Article.

An application for license shall be made to the Commissioner. If the private personnel service is owned by an individual, the application shall be made by that individual; if the service is owned by a partnership, the application shall be made by all partners; if the service is owned by a corporation, the application shall be made by all stockholders who own at least twenty percent (20%) of the issued and outstanding voting stock of the corporation, or if the service is owned by an association, society, or corporation in which no one individual owns at least twenty percent (20%) of the issued and outstanding voting stock, the application shall be made by the president, vice-president, secretary and treasurer of the owner, by whatever title designated. The application shall state the name and address of the individual who is responsible for the direction and operation of the placement activities of the private personnel service whether that individual be one of the applicants or another person; whether or not that individual has ever been employed in a private personnel service; the name and address of each of the license applicant’s prior employers during the five years immediately preceding the license application; and such other information relating to the good moral character of that individual as the Commissioner may require. No change in such persons shall take place without prior notification to the Commissioner.

Each application for license shall be in writing and in the form prescribed by the Commissioner, and shall state truthfully the name under which the business is to be conducted; the street and number of the building or place where the business is to be conducted.

Upon the receipt of an application for a license the Commissioner:

Shall publish a notice of the pending application in a newspaper of general circulation in the area of the proposed location of the employment agency and may publish the notice in a newspaper of general circulation in each area in which the applicant (or if a corporation, the president and majority shareholder) has resided during the five years preceding the time of the application. The applicant shall incur the cost associated with the publication of this legal advertisement. The notice shall include a statement informing individuals of their right to protest the issuance of a license by filing within 10 days written comments with the Commissioner. The protest shall be in writing and signed by the person filing the protest or by his authorized agent or attorney, and shall state reasons why the license should not be granted. Upon the filing of a protest, the Commissioner, if he determines the protest to be of such a nature that a hearing should be conducted and that the protest is for a cause on which denial of a license may properly be based, shall appoint a time and place for a hearing on the application and shall give at least seven days’ notice of that time and place to the license applicant and to the person filing the protest. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the rules of the Administrative Procedure Act.

Shall investigate the character, criminal record and business integrity of each applicant for agency license and shall investigate the criminal records of all persons listed as agency owners, officers, directors or managers. The applicant and all agency owners, officers, directors and managers shall assist the department in obtaining necessary information by authorizing the release of all relevant information. The applicant shall incur the cost associated with this background investigation.

(2a)

The Department of Public Safety may provide a criminal record check to the Commissioner for a person or agency who has applied for a license through the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall provide to the Department of Public Safety, along with the request, the fingerprints of all applicants, any additional information required by the Department of Public Safety, and a form signed by the applicants consenting to the check of the criminal record and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the State or national repositories. The applicants’ fingerprints shall be forwarded to the State Bureau of Investigation for a search of the State’s criminal history record file, and the State Bureau of Investigation shall forward a set of the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history check. The Commissioner shall keep all information pursuant to this subdivision privileged, in accordance with applicable State law and federal guidelines, and the information shall be confidential and shall not be a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.The Department of Public Safety may charge each applicant a fee for conducting the checks of criminal history records authorized by this subdivision.

Upon completion of the investigation, or 60 days after the application was received, whichever is later, but in no case more than 75 days after the application was received, shall determine whether or not a license should be issued. The license shall be denied for any of the following reasons:

If the applicant for agency license, or the president or majority shareholder of a corporate applicant, omits or falsifies any material information asked for in the application and required by the Commissioner.

If any owner, officer, director or manager of the employment agency:

Has been convicted in any state of the criminal offense of embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, forgery, conspiracy to defraud or any similar offense involving fraud or moral turpitude;

Was an owner, officer, director or manager of an employment agency or other business whose license was revoked or that was otherwise caused to cease operation by action of any State or federal agency or court because of violations of law or regulation relating to deceptive or unfair practices in the conduct of business;

As an owner or manager of an employment agency or other business or as an employment counselor was found by any State or federal agency or court to have violated any law or regulation relating to deceptive or unfair practices in the conduct of business; or

In any other demonstrable way engaged in deceptive or unfair practices in the conduct of business.

If the employment agency will be operated on the same premises as a loan agency (as defined in

G.S. 105-88

) or collection agency (as defined in

G.S. 58-70-15

).

If it appears upon the hearing or from the inspection, examination or investigation made by the Commissioner that the owners, partners, corporation officers or the agency manager are not persons of good moral character or that the license applicant has not complied with the provisions of this Article, the application shall be denied and a license shall not be granted. The Commissioner shall find facts to substantiate his denial of the issuance of a license. Each application shall be granted or refused within 60 days from the date of its filing, or if a hearing is held, within 75 days. Any license heretofore or hereafter issued shall expire 12 months from the date of its issuance, and shall be renewed as hereinafter provided unless sooner revoked by the Commissioner.

No license shall be granted to a person to operate as a private personnel service where the name of the business is similar or identical to that of any existing licensed business (except where a franchiser has licensed two or more persons to use the same name within the State) or directly or indirectly expresses or connotes any limitation, specification or discrimination contrary to current State or federal laws against discrimination in employment.

Every license shall contain the name of the person licensed and shall designate the city in which the license is issued, the name of the manager and date of the license. The license shall be displayed in a conspicuous place in the area where job applicants are received by the agency.

A license granted as provided in this Article shall not be valid for any person other than the person to whom it is issued or for any place other than that designated in the license and shall not be assigned or transferred without the consent of the Commissioner, whose consent must be based on the standards contained in this Article. Applications for consent to assign or transfer shall be made in the same manner as an application for a license, and all the provisions of this Article shall apply to applications for consent. The location of a private personnel service shall not be changed without notice to the Commissioner, and any change of location shall be endorsed upon the license. A person who has obtained a license in accordance with the provisions of this Article may apply for additional licenses to conduct additional private personnel services in accordance with the provisions of this Article. The manner of application, and the conditions and terms applicable to the issuance of the additional licenses shall be the same as for an original license. The same agency manager may be designated in all such licenses.

Temporary license. — If ownership of a licensed private personnel service is transferred, the department shall issue a temporary license to any new owner or successor if it appears to the department that issuance of such a license would serve the public interest. A temporary license shall be effective for a period of 90 days and shall not be renewed.

Each licensee shall, before the license is issued or renewed, deposit with the department a bond payable to the State of North Carolina and executed by a surety company duly authorized to transact business in the State of North Carolina in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and upon condition that the private personnel service will pay to applicants all refunds due under this Article and regulations adopted hereunder if the private personnel service terminates its business.

History.

1929, c. 178, ss. 2, 3; 1931, c. 312, s. 3; 1979, c. 780, s. 1; 1987, c. 282, s. 12; 1989, c. 414, s. 2; 2002-147, s. 12; 2003-308, s. 9; 2014-100, s. 17.1(o).

§ 95-47.3.
Fees and contracts; filing with Commissioner.

Every license applicant shall file with the Commissioner a schedule of fees or charges made by the private personnel service to applicants for employment for any services rendered, stating clearly the conditions under which the private personnel service refunds or does not refund a fee, together with all rules or regulations that may in any manner affect the fees charged or to be charged for any service. Every license applicant and licensee shall include in its schedule of fees or charges a clear description of how it determines fees for placement of employment, the compensation of which is based, in whole or in part, on commission. Changes in the schedule may be made, but no change shall become effective until seven calendar days after the filing thereof with the Commissioner. It is unlawful for a private personnel service to charge, demand, collect or receive a greater compensation from an applicant for employment for any service performed than as specified in the schedule filed with the Commissioner.

Every license applicant shall file with the Commissioner a copy of the contract which the private personnel service will require applicants for employment to execute.

History.

1979, c. 780, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 970, s. 1.

§ 95-47.3A.
Fee reimbursement from employers due to overstated earnings expectations.

An applicant who accepts employment that is compensated in whole or in part on a commission basis, and who pays a fee to the licensee calculated on the commission-based compensation amount stated by the employer in the written job order, may file a written complaint with the Commissioner if the applicant did not earn at least eighty percent (80%) of the compensation amount stated by the employer in the written job order. If the applicant files the written complaint before the period upon which the anticipated earnings is based has ended, the Commissioner shall prorate the amount earned over the period of time the applicant worked prior to the filing of the complaint in order to determine whether or not the applicant earned at least eighty percent (80%) of the compensation amount stated by the employer in the written job order.

The Commissioner shall investigate all complaints filed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. After completion of the investigation and a hearing, the Commissioner shall order the employer to reimburse the applicant for part or all of the fee paid by the applicant to the licensee if the Commissioner finds the applicant is entitled to the refund based on all of the following:

The applicant did not earn at least eighty percent (80%) of the compensation amount stated by the employer in the written job order;

The licensee reasonably relied on the compensation information provided by the employer in calculating the fee paid by the applicant;

It is unrealistic to expect that an employee could earn substantially the amount of commission-based compensation stated by the employer in the written job order filed with the licensee; and

The fee paid by the applicant to the licensee was calculated based on the commission-based compensation stated by the employer in the written job order.

The reimbursement due the applicant under subsection (b) shall be the difference between the fee actually paid by the applicant to the licensee, and the fee that the applicant would have paid if the compensation stated by the employer in the written job order had been what the applicant actually earned or reasonably could have earned during the applicable employment period.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules setting forth procedures for complaints and investigations, and standards for determining whether a statement by the employer in the licensee’s written job order of potential or anticipated commission-based earnings is realistic under the circumstances. The Commissioner or his authorized representative shall have power to administer oaths and examine witnesses, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, records, payrolls, documents, and take depositions and affidavits in any proceeding hereunder. Additionally, the Commissioner shall adopt rules setting forth procedures for enforcement of any order made under subsections (b) and (c) of this section. Rules adopted by the Commissioner pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

The Commissioner shall enforce and administer the provisions of this section, and the Commissioner or his authorized representative is empowered to hold hearings and to institute civil proceedings to collect on behalf of the applicant any amounts determined to be owed by the employer.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 970, s. 3.

§ 95-47.4.
Contracts; contents; approval; tying contracts forbidden.

A contract between a private personnel service and an applicant shall be in writing, labeled as a contract, physically separate from any application and made in duplicate. One copy shall be given to the applicant and the other shall be kept by the private personnel service as required by G.S. 95-47.5(2).

Any contract that obligates an applicant to pay a fee to the private personnel service shall include:

The name, address and telephone number of the private personnel service;

The name of the applicant;

The date the contract was signed;

A clear schedule of the fees to be charged to the applicant at various salary levels;

A clear explanation of when the applicant becomes obligated to pay a fee;

A clear refund policy (or no refund policy) that conforms to the requirements of G.S. 95-47.4(f) and (g);

If the applicant is obligated whether or not the applicant accepts employment, a clear explanation of the services provided and a statement that the private personnel service does not guarantee that the applicant will obtain employment as a result of its services;

A statement, in a type size no smaller than nine point, directly above the place for the applicant’s signature, that reads as follows: “I have read and received a copy of this CONTRACT, which I understand makes me legally obligated to pay a fee under conditions outlined above.” In the preceding statement the word “CONTRACT” and no others shall be in all capitals; and

A statement that the private personnel service is licensed and regulated by the Commissioner and the address at which a copy of laws and regulations governing private personnel services may be obtained.

A copy of each contract form to be used with applicants shall be filed with the Commissioner. Until the private personnel service receives written notification from the Commissioner that the form conforms to the requirements of this Article and regulations adopted hereunder, it shall not be used with applicants.

A private personnel service shall not require an applicant to sign a contract with the private personnel service before the applicant has had an opportunity to read the contract and discuss the contract with an employee of the personnel agency who regularly arranges contacts and assists in negotiations between employers and applicants. A private personnel service shall not coerce an applicant into signing a contract by applying or using duress, undue influence, fraud or misrepresentation sufficient to invalidate the contract under North Carolina law.

Any contract that obligates an applicant to pay a fee to the private personnel service when the applicant accepts employment shall be physically separate from any contract that obligates an applicant to pay a fee whether or not the applicant accepts employment. A private personnel service shall not require an applicant to sign one contract as a prerequisite to signing another contract or to pay a fee as a prerequisite to signing a contract. Express violations of this subsection are the following:

Refusal to allow an applicant to contract for counseling, job information or resume writing services, if the applicant does not agree to pay an additional fee upon acceptance of employment; and

Refusal to allow an applicant to contract for services which obligate the applicant only upon acceptance of employment, if the applicant does not agree to pay a registration fee or to contract for counseling, resume writing or other services.

If a private personnel service has a refund policy, included on each contract that obligates an applicant upon acceptance of employment will be a statement defining:

The length of the period of time covered by the refund policy;

The exact manner of computing the refund so that the amount of refund due the applicant will be clear;

The conditions under which a refund becomes due to the applicant. The conditions of the refund, if other than unconditional policy is used, shall contain a definition of the reasons for which a refund will not be made. A refund will not be denied except for a reason so stated in the definition of the contract;

A personnel service shall abide by the refund policy stated on its contract by promptly paying to applicants any refund due under the terms of the contract.

If a private personnel service has no refund policy, the private personnel service shall include on each contract that obligates an applicant upon acceptance of employment, in a type size no smaller than nine point, a statement that reads as follows:“ _______________ (name of private personnel service) will make NO REFUND under any circumstances of fees paid by the applicant.” In the preceding statement the words NO REFUND and no others shall be in all capitals.

If a private personnel service places an applicant in a position of employment, the compensation of which is based, in whole or in part, on commission, the private personnel service shall:

Have a written job order from the employer that includes the anticipated earnings upon which the private personnel service may base its fee, or

In lieu of the written job order required by subdivision (1) of this subsection, have a policy of providing the same fee reimbursement as may be available to applicants from employers under the provisions of

G.S. 95-47.3

A.In no case may the applicant collect the same reimbursement from both the employer and the private personnel service. When the private personnel service elects to obtain the written job order from the employer and not have its own reimbursement policy as described in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the private personnel service shall explain to the applicant and the employer how the fee for the placement is calculated, and shall inform in writing both the applicant and the employer of the provisions of

G.S. 95-47.3

A governing fee refunds from employers.

History.

1979, c. 780, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 970, s. 2; 1993, c. 202, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 29(a).

§ 95-47.5.
Records.

Every private personnel service shall maintain for a period of two years, the following records:

Job orders or job specifications.

Executed applicant contracts.

Information on all placements made, including the employer’s name and address; name and address of applicant placed; salary of the position; amount of fee charged; and refunds, where applicable.

History.

1929, c. 178, s. 4; 1931, c. 312, s. 3; 1979, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 95-47.6.
Prohibited acts.

A private personnel service shall not engage in any of the following activities or conduct:

Induce or attempt to induce any employee placed by that private personnel service to terminate his employment in order to obtain other employment through the private personnel service; or procure or attempt to procure the discharge of any person from his employment.

Publish or cause to be published any false or fraudulent information, representation, promise, notice or advertisement.

Advertise in newspapers or otherwise, unless the advertising contains the name of the private personnel service and the word “personnel service.”

Direct an applicant to visit or call upon an employer for the purpose of obtaining employment without having first obtained a job order or authorization from the employer for the interview. A private personnel service may attempt to sell the services of an applicant to an employer from whom no job order has been received and may charge a fee if the efforts result in the applicant’s being employed.

Send or cause to be sent any person to any employer where the private personnel service knows that the prospective employment is or would be in violation of State or federal laws governing minimum wages or child labor, or has been notified that a labor dispute is in progress, without notifying the applicant of that fact, or knowingly arrange an interview for an employment or occupation prohibited by law.

Send or cause to be sent any person to any place which the private personnel service knows is maintained for immoral or illicit purposes.

Divide or share, either directly or indirectly, the fees collected by the private personnel service, with contractors, sub-contractors, employers or their agents, foremen or anyone in their employ, or if the contractors, sub-contractors or employers be a corporation, any of the officers, directors or employees of the corporation to whom applicants for employment are sent.

Make, cause to be made, or use any name, sign or advertising device bearing a name which is similar to or may reasonably be confused with the name of a federal, State, city, county or other governmental unit or agency.

Knowingly make any false or misleading promise or representation or give any false or misleading information to any applicant or employer in regard to any employment, work or position, its nature, location, duration, compensation or the circumstances surrounding any employment, work or position including the availability thereof.

Accept a registration fee from an applicant.

Impose or attempt to collect any fee from any applicant unless that applicant accepts employment with an employer to which the applicant was directly or indirectly introduced by the private personnel service.

A fee may be charged for resume writing provided the private personnel service does not require the applicant to become obligated for any other services.

History.

1979, c. 780, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Consumer Protection—The Unfair Trade Practice Act and the Insurance Code: Does Per Se Necessarily Preempt?,” see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 487 (1988).

§ 95-47.7.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-308, s. 10, effective July 1, 2003.

§ 95-47.8.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-308, s. 11, effective July 1, 2003.

§ 95-47.9.
Enforcement of Article; rules; hearing; penalty; criminal penalties.

This Article shall be enforced by the Commissioner. The Commissioner or any duly authorized agent, deputies or assistants designated by the Commissioner, may upon receipt of a complaint that a private personnel service has violated a specific section of this Article, inspect those records relevant to the complaint which this Article requires the private personnel service to retain. The Commissioner may also subpoena those records and witnesses and may conduct investigations of any employer or other person where the Commissioner has reasonable grounds for believing that the employer or person has conspired or is conspiring with a private personnel service to violate this Article.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to carry out and administer the provisions of this Article.

Complaints against any licensed person shall be made in writing to the Commissioner.

If the complaint alleges a violation of this Article, the Commissioner shall cause an investigation to be made. If, as a result of the investigation, the Commissioner has reason to believe that a material violation of this Article has been committed by a private personnel service, the Commissioner may, after compliance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, deny, suspend, or revoke a license issued under this Article if it is determined that the licensee or any employee of the licensee is guilty of violating the provisions of this Article. In addition, the Commissioner may issue warnings or levy a fine against the private personnel service that shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).

The denial, revocation, or suspension of a license or the issuance of a warning or fine by the Commissioner shall be in writing, shall be signed by the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee, and shall state the grounds upon which the decision is based. The aggrieved person shall have the right to appeal from the decision as provided by Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

Whenever a license is revoked pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, another license shall not be issued to the same person within three years from the date of the revocation.

Any person who operates as a private personnel service without first obtaining the appropriate license (i) shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor; and (ii) be subject to a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each day the private personnel service operates without a license, the penalty not to exceed a total of two thousand dollars ($2,000). Actions to recover civil penalties shall be initiated by the Attorney General. The clear proceeds of civil penalties provided for in this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1929, c. 178, ss. 3-5, 7, 9; 1931, c. 312, s. 3; 1979, c. 780, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 663; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1998-215, s. 109; 2003-308, s. 12.

§ 95-47.10.
Power of Commissioner to seek injunction.

The Commissioner may apply to courts having jurisdiction for injunctions to prevent violations of this Chapter or of rules issued pursuant thereto, and such courts are empowered to grant such injunctions regardless of whether criminal prosecution or other action has been or may be instituted as a result of such violation. A single act of unauthorized or illegal practice shall be sufficient, if shown, to invoke the injunctive relief of this section or criminal or civil penalties under

G.S. 95-47.9(e)

.

History.

1979, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 95-47.11.
Government employment agencies unaffected.

This Article shall not in any manner affect or apply to the State of North Carolina, the government of the United States, or to any city, county or town, or any agency of any of those governments.

History.

1929, c. 178, s. 10; 1979, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 95-47.12.
License taxes placed upon agencies not affected.

This Article is not intended to conflict with or affect any license tax placed upon private personnel services by the revenue laws of North Carolina, but instead shall be construed as supplementary thereto in exercising the police powers of the State.

History.

1929, c. 178, s. 11; 1979, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 95-47.13.
Severability.

If any provision of this Article or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this Article are severable.

History.

1929, c. 178, s. 9; 1979, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 95-47.14.
Notification requirement.

Any temporary help service as described in G.S. 95-47.1(16)c that operates in North Carolina shall notify the Department of Labor in writing that the temporary help service:

Operates only as a temporary help service;

Establishes an employer-employee relationship with its temporaries;

Does not operate as a private personnel service or an employer fee paid personnel consulting service.

History.

1989, c. 414, s. 3.

§ 95-47.15.
Certification requirement.

Any employer fee paid personnel consulting service or temporary help service, as the two terms are described in G.S. 95-47.1(16)f, that operates in North Carolina shall certify annually to the Department of Labor on a form prescribed by the Commissioner that the service:

Operates on a one hundred percent (100%) employer fee paid basis;

Requires no applicant placement contract; and

Has no recourse against an applicant for a fee under any circumstances.

History.

1989, c. 414, s. 3.

§§ 95-47.16 through 95-47.18.

Reserved for future codification purposes.